New York, session 2025-2026, S5614.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clauses (B) and (C) of subparagraph (i) of paragraph (b) of 2 subdivision 2 of section 495-a of the general municipal law, as amended 3 by chapter 470 of the laws of 2019, are amended to read as follows: 4 (B) within any apartment, condominium or cooperative complex, retire- 5 ment community, or other group residential complex or facility where (I) 6 sponsored by the operator of or an association related to such complex, 7 community or facility, (II) such games are conducted solely for the 8 purpose of amusement and recreation of its residents, (III) no player or 9 other person furnishes anything of value for the opportunity to partic- 10 ipate, (IV) the value of the prizes shall not exceed ten dollars for any 11 one game or a total of one hundred fifty dollars in any calendar day, 12 (V) such games are not conducted on more than [one day] two days per 13 week and not more than [thirty] sixty times during any calendar year, 14 and (VI) no person other than an employee or volunteer of such complex, 15 community or facility conducts or assists in conducting the game or 16 games. 17 (C) on behalf of any bona fide social, charitable, educational, recre- 18 ational, fraternal, religious, not-for-profit or age group organization, 19 club or association solely for the purpose of amusement and recreation 20 of its members or beneficiaries where (I) no player or other person 21 furnishes anything of value for the opportunity to participate, (II) the 22 value of the prizes shall not exceed ten dollars for any one game or a 23 total of one hundred fifty dollars in any calendar day, (III) such games EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07330-03-5 S. 5614 2 1 are not conducted on more than [one day] two days per week and not more 2 than [thirty] sixty times during any calendar year, (IV) no person other 3 than a bona fide active member of the organization, club or association 4 participates in the conduct of the games, and (V) no person is paid for 5 conducting or assisting in the conduct of the game or games. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 7 have become a law.